Tennessee, session 114, HB1135.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-1-907, is amended by deleting the
first sentence of the section and substituting:
By December 31 of each year, the department of education shall submit an early grades
reading report to the education committee of the senate and the committees of the
house of representatives with jurisdiction over subject matter pertaining to education.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1135
002648
- 1 -